Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 10. PROPERTY AND CASUALTY INSURANCE

SUBTITLE B. LIABILITY INSURANCE FOR PHYSICIANS AND

HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS

CHAPTER 1902. CERTAIN LIABILITY COVERAGE FOR PHYSICIANS AND HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS

Sec. 1902.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Health care provider" has the meaning assigned by Section 1901.001.

(2) "Manufacturer" has the meaning assigned by Section 82.001, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

(3) "Physician" has the meaning assigned by Section 1901.001.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 1902.002. COVERAGE FOR PHYSICIANS OR HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS UNDER VENDOR ENDORSEMENTS OR CERTAIN POLICIES. A physician or health care provider is considered a vendor for purposes of coverage under a vendor's endorsement or a manufacturer's general liability or products liability policy.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 1902.003. EXCLUSIONS AND LIMITATIONS ON COVERAGE UNDER VENDOR ENDORSEMENTS PROHIBITED. An insurer may not exclude or otherwise limit coverage for physicians or health care providers under a vendor's endorsement issued to a manufacturer.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.